Utah statutes.
17-53-316.   Executive orders.

(1)  The county executive may issue an executive order to:

(a)  establish an executive policy;

(b)  implement an executive practice; or

(c)  execute a legislative policy or ordinance, as provided by statute.

(2)  An executive order may not:

(a)  be inconsistent with county ordinances addressing or with policies established by the county legislative body addressing the same subject as the executive order; or

(b)  expand or narrow legislative action taken or legislative policy issued by the county legislative body.

(3)  Each executive order exercising supervisory power over other elected county officers shall be consistent with the authority given the county executive under Section 17-53-106.

